Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 5

Grazing [Repealed]

44-8-501. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-501 (Code 1858, § 1652 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 62, § 2); Shan., § 2786; Code 1932, § 5017; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1601,44-8-201), concerning ranging leave not to be given to residents, was repealed by 1999 Acts, ch. 266, § 5.

44-8-502. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-502 (Code 1858, § 1651 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 62, § 1); Shan., § 2785; Code 1932, § 5016; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1602,44-8-202), concerning the penalty for nonresidents driving stock from abroad to range here, was repealed by 1999 Acts, ch. 266, § 5.

44-8-503. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-503 (Code 1858, § 1653 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 62, § 2); Shan., § 2787; Code 1932, § 5018; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1603,44-8-203), concerning, attachment for penalty, was repealed by 1999 Acts, ch. 266, § 5.